Arkansas, session 2025, SB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 27, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-2709. Marketing — Legislative intent.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that potential
and actual enrollees in a risk-based provider organization have a right to
know:
(1) Whether a direct service provider is or will be in-network
with a particular risk-based provider organization; and
(2) The consequences of choosing a risk-based provider
organization in which that direct service provider is not participating as a
network direct service provider.
(b) It is not a marketing violation for a direct service provider to
inform an existing or potential Medicaid enrollee in a risk-based provider
*JMB317*
03-10-2025 11:55:58 JMB317

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 SB222
organization of its network status with a particular risk-based provider
organization.
(c) The Department of Human Services or a risk-based provider
organization shall not:
(1) Require a direct service provider to separate communications
about its network status from communications about open enrollment if the
direct service provider informs the existing or potential enrollee that the
enrollee has freedom of choice among risk-based provider organizations and
network providers; or
(2) Restrict direct service providers from responding to an
individual’s questions about open enrollment or network status if the direct
service provider does not attempt to influence that individual’s choice of
risk-based provider organizations or respond in any manner that is inaccurate
or misleading.
(d) A direct service provider shall comply with the provisions
applicable to providers in the federal managed care rule on marketing
activities at 42 C.F.R. § 438.104, as existing on January 1, 2025.
(e) The department shall revise the marketing rules to comply with
this section.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that enrollees and providers both
face confusion and uncertainty around the information a provider may
communicate to an enrollee about the provider and its network status with
risk-based provider organizations; that this confusion is negatively
impacting the ability of Medicaid beneficiaries to make informed decisions
about their care; that Medicaid beneficiaries face these decisions at least
annually when the Medicaid beneficiaries are assigned to a risk-based
provider organization or waiver wait list and “for cause” at any time due to
circumstances that may be out of their control; and that this act is
immediately necessary to ensure that Medicaid beneficiaries receive
appropriate information from their providers to ensure continuity of care.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
03-10-2025 11:55:58 JMB317

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 SB222
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/B. Davis





























03-10-2025 11:55:58 JMB317